Utah statutes.
17B-2a-809.   Public transit districts to submit agendas and minutes of
board meetings.
(1)  The board of trustees of each public transit district shall submit to
each constituent entity, as defined in Section 17B-1-701:
(a)  a copy of the board agenda and a notice of the location and time of the
board meeting within the same time frame provided to members of the board
prior to the meeting; and
(b)  a copy of the minutes of board meetings within five working days
following approval of the minutes.
(2)  The board may submit notices, agendas, and minutes by electronic mail if
agreed to by the constituent entity as defined under Section 17B-1-701.
